apertium-kha.kha.twoc
Alphabet

 %[%-abs%]:0
 %[%+abs%]:0
 %[%-nmz%]:0
 %[%+nmz%]:0
 %[%-prog%]:0
 %[%+prog%]:0
 %[%+futAsp%]:0
 %[%-futAsp%]:0
 %[%+pastAsp%]:0
 %[%-pastAsp%]:0
 %[%+caus%]:0
 %[%-caus%]:0
 %[%+emph%]:0
 %[%-emph%]:0
 %[%+adjize%]:0
 %[%-adjize%]:0

;

Rules

"Remove paths without matching prefix feature"
Fx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       _ :* Fy:0 ;
   where Fx in ( %[%-abs%] %[%-nmz%] %[%-prog%] %[%-futAsp%] %[%-pastAsp%] %[%-caus%] %[%-emph%] %[%-adjize%] )
         Fy in ( %[%+abs%] %[%+nmz%] %[%+prog%] %[%+futAsp%] %[%+pastAsp%] %[%+caus%] %[%+emph%] %[%+adjize%] )
   matched ;


"Remove paths without matching prefix feature in generation"
Fx:0 /<= _ ;
   except
       Fy:0 :* _ ;
   where Fy in ( %[%-abs%] %[%-nmz%] %[%-prog%] %[%-futAsp%] %[%-pastAsp%] %[%-caus%] %[%-emph%] %[%-adjize%] )
         Fx in ( %[%+abs%] %[%+nmz%] %[%+prog%] %[%+futAsp%] %[%+pastAsp%] %[%+caus%] %[%+emph%] %[%+adjize%] )
   matched ; 
